Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.184

Apple health and homes account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The apple health and homes account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for permanent supportive housing programs administered by the office created in RCW 43.330.181, including acquisition and development of permanent supportive housing units, operations, maintenance, and services costs of permanent supportive housing units, project-based vouchers, provider grants, and other purposes authorized by appropriations made in the operating budget. The department must prioritize allocating at least 10 percent of the expenditures from the account to organizations that serve and are substantially governed by individuals disproportionately impacted by homelessness and behavioral health conditions, including black, indigenous, and other people of color, lesbian, gay, bisexual, queer, transgender, and other gender diverse individuals. When selecting projects supported by funds from the account, the office shall balance the state's interest in quickly approving and financing projects, the degree to which the project will leverage other funds, the extent to which the project promotes racial equity, and the extent to which the project will promote priorities of chapter 216, Laws of 2022 on a statewide basis, including in rural areas and in geographically diverse parts of the state.

[ 2022 c 216 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2022 c 216: See notes following RCW 74.09.885.